Nebraska, session 109, LB431.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-401 As used in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Administer means to directly apply a controlled substance by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means to the body of a
patient or research subject;
(2) Agent means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the
direction of another person but does not include a common or contract
carrier, public warehouse keeper, or employee of a carrier or warehouse
keeper;
(3) Administration means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the
United States Department of Justice;
(4) Controlled substance means a drug, biological, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V of section 28-405.
Controlled substance does not include distilled spirits, wine, malt
beverages, tobacco, hemp, or any nonnarcotic substance if such substance
may, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et
seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2014, and the law of this state,
be lawfully sold over the counter without a prescription;
(5) Counterfeit substance means a controlled substance which, or the
container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the
trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number, or
device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or
dispenser other than the person or persons who in fact manufactured,
distributed, or dispensed such substance and which thereby falsely
purports or is represented to be the product of, or to have been
distributed by, such other manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser;
(6) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(7) Division of Drug Control means the personnel of the Nebraska
State Patrol who are assigned to enforce the Uniform Controlled
-2-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
Substances Act;
(8) Dispense means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate
user or a research subject pursuant to a medical order issued by a
practitioner authorized to prescribe, including the packaging, labeling,
or compounding necessary to prepare the controlled substance for such
delivery;
(9) Distribute means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance;
(10) Prescribe means to issue a medical order;
(11) Drug means (a) articles recognized in the official United
States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United
States, official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them,
(b) substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals, and (c)
substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in
subdivision (a) or (b) of this subdivision, but does not include devices
or their components, parts, or accessories;
(12) Deliver or delivery means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled substance,
whether or not there is an agency relationship;
(13) Hemp has the same meaning as in section 2-503;
(14)(a) Marijuana means all parts of the plant of the genus
cannabis, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant or
its seeds.
(b) Marijuana does not include the mature stalks of such plant,
hashish, tetrahydrocannabinols extracted or isolated from the plant,
fiber produced from such stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of such
plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of such mature stalks, the sterilized seed of such plant
which is incapable of germination, or cannabidiol contained in a drug
-3-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(c) Marijuana does not include hemp.
(d) When the weight of marijuana is referred to in the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, it means its weight at or about the time it is
seized or otherwise comes into the possession of law enforcement
authorities, whether cured or uncured at that time;
(15) Manufacture means the production, preparation, propagation,
conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or
indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin,
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or
repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container.
Manufacture does not include the preparation or compounding of a
controlled substance by an individual for his or her own use, except for
the preparation or compounding of components or ingredients used for or
intended to be used for the manufacture of methamphetamine, or the
preparation, compounding, conversion, packaging, or labeling of a
controlled substance: (a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her
prescribing, administering, or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of his or her professional practice; or (b) by a practitioner,
or by his or her authorized agent under his or her supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical
analysis and not for sale;
(16) Narcotic drug means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin,
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis: (a) Opium, opium poppy and poppy
straw, coca leaves, and opiates; (b) a compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, or preparation of opium, coca leaves, or opiates; or (c) a
substance and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, or preparation
thereof which is chemically equivalent to or identical with any of the
-4-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
substances referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subdivision,
except that the words narcotic drug as used in the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act does not include decocainized coca leaves or extracts of
coca leaves, which extracts do not contain cocaine or ecgonine, or
isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
(17) Opiate means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-
sustaining liability. Opiate does not include the dextrorotatory isomer
of 3-methoxy-n methylmorphinan and its salts. Opiate includes its racemic
and levorotatory forms;
(18) Opium poppy means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum
L., except the seeds thereof;
(19) Poppy straw means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium
poppy after mowing;
(20) Person means any corporation, association, partnership, limited
liability company, or one or more persons;
(21) Practitioner means a physician, a physician assistant, a
dentist, a veterinarian, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, an optometrist, a
certified nurse midwife, a certified registered nurse anesthetist, a
nurse practitioner, a scientific investigator, a pharmacy, a hospital, or
any other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, prescribe, conduct research with respect to, or
administer a controlled substance in the course of practice or research
in this state, including an emergency medical service as defined in
section 38-1207;
(22) Production includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, or
harvesting of a controlled substance;
(23) Immediate precursor means a substance which is the principal
compound commonly used or produced primarily for use and which is an
immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the
-5-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
manufacture of a controlled substance, the control of which is necessary
to prevent, curtail, or limit such manufacture;
(24) State means the State of Nebraska;
(25) Ultimate user means a person who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for his or her own use, for the use of a member of
his or her household, or for administration to an animal owned by him or
her or by a member of his or her household;
(26) Hospital has the same meaning as in section 71-419;
(27) Cooperating individual means any person, other than a
commissioned law enforcement officer, who acts on behalf of, at the
request of, or as agent for a law enforcement agency for the purpose of
gathering or obtaining evidence of offenses punishable under the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act;
(28)(a) Hashish or concentrated cannabis means (i) the separated
resin, whether crude or purified, obtained from a plant of the genus
cannabis or (ii) any material, preparation, mixture, compound, or other
substance which contains ten percent or more by weight of
tetrahydrocannabinols.
(b) When resins extracted from hemp as defined in section 2-503 are
in the possession of a person as authorized under the Nebraska Hemp
Farming Act, they are not considered hashish or concentrated cannabis for
purposes of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.
(c) Hashish or concentrated cannabis does not include cannabidiol
contained in a drug product approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(29) Exceptionally hazardous drug means (a) a narcotic drug, (b)
thiophene analog of phencyclidine, (c) phencyclidine, (d) amobarbital,
(e) secobarbital, (f) pentobarbital, (g) amphetamine, or (h)
methamphetamine;
(30) Imitation controlled substance means a substance which is not a
controlled substance or controlled substance analogue but which, by way
-6-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
of express or implied representations and consideration of other relevant
factors including those specified in section 28-445, would lead a
reasonable person to believe the substance is a controlled substance or
controlled substance analogue. A placebo or registered investigational
drug manufactured, distributed, possessed, or delivered in the ordinary
course of practice or research by a health care professional shall not be
deemed to be an imitation controlled substance;
(31)(a) Controlled substance analogue means a substance (i) the
chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical
structure of a Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substance as provided
in section 28-405 or (ii) which has a stimulant, depressant, analgesic,
or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is
substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, depressant,
analgesic, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
Schedule I or Schedule II controlled substance as provided in section
28-405. A controlled substance analogue shall, to the extent intended for
human consumption, be treated as a controlled substance under Schedule I
of section 28-405 for purposes of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act;
and
(b) Controlled substance analogue does not include (i) a controlled
substance, (ii) any substance generally recognized as safe and effective
within the meaning of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
301 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2014, (iii) any substance
for which there is an approved new drug application, or (iv) with respect
to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in effect for
investigational use for that person, under section 505 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 355, as such section existed on
January 1, 2014, to the extent conduct with respect to such substance is
pursuant to such exemption;
(32) Anabolic steroid means any drug or hormonal substance,
chemically and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than
-7-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
estrogens, progestins, and corticosteroids), that promotes muscle growth
and includes any controlled substance in Schedule III(d) of section
28-405. Anabolic steroid does not include any anabolic steroid which is
expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other
nonhuman species and has been approved by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services for such administration, but if any person prescribes,
dispenses, or distributes such a steroid for human use, such person shall
be considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an anabolic
steroid within the meaning of this subdivision;
(33) Chart order means an order for a controlled substance issued by
a practitioner for a patient who is in the hospital where the chart is
stored or for a patient receiving detoxification treatment or maintenance
treatment pursuant to section 28-412. Chart order does not include a
prescription;
(34) Medical order means a prescription, a chart order, or an order
for pharmaceutical care issued by a practitioner;
(35) Prescription means an order for a controlled substance issued
by a practitioner. Prescription does not include a chart order;
(36) Registrant means any person who has a controlled substances
registration issued by the state or the Drug Enforcement Administration
of the United States Department of Justice;
(37) Reverse distributor means a person whose primary function is to
act as an agent for a pharmacy, wholesaler, manufacturer, or other entity
by receiving, inventorying, and managing the disposition of outdated,
expired, or otherwise nonsaleable controlled substances;
(38) Signature means the name, word, or mark of a person written in
his or her own hand with the intent to authenticate a writing or other
form of communication or a digital signature which complies with section
86-611 or an electronic signature;
(39) Facsimile means a copy generated by a system that encodes a
document or photograph into electrical signals, transmits those signals
-8-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
over telecommunications lines, and reconstructs the signals to create an
exact duplicate of the original document at the receiving end;
(40) Electronic signature has the definition found in section
86-621;
(41) Electronic transmission means transmission of information in
electronic form. Electronic transmission includes computer-to-computer
transmission or computer-to-facsimile transmission;
(42) Long-term care facility means an intermediate care facility, an
intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities, a
long-term care hospital, a mental health substance use treatment center,
a nursing facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are
defined in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;
(43) Compounding has the same meaning as in section 38-2811;
(44) Cannabinoid receptor agonist means any chemical compound or
substance that, according to scientific or medical research, study,
testing, or analysis, demonstrates the presence of binding activity at
one or more of the CB1 or CB2 cell membrane receptors located within the
human body. Cannabinoid receptor agonist does not include cannabidiol
contained in a drug product approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration; and
(45) Kratom means any product or ingredient containing:
(a) Any part of the leaf of the mitragyna speciosa plant if the
plant contains the alkaloid mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine; or
(b) A synthetic material that contains the alkaloid mitragynine or
7-hydroxymitragynine; and
(46) (45) Lookalike substance means a product or substance, not
specifically designated as a controlled substance in section 28-405, that
is either portrayed in such a manner by a person to lead another person
to reasonably believe that it produces effects on the human body that
replicate, mimic, or are intended to simulate the effects produced by a
controlled substance or that possesses one or more of the following
-9-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
indicia or characteristics:
(a) The packaging or labeling of the product or substance suggests
that the user will achieve euphoria, hallucination, mood enhancement,
stimulation, or another effect on the human body that replicates or
mimics those produced by a controlled substance;
(b) The name or packaging of the product or substance uses images or
labels suggesting that it is a controlled substance or produces effects
on the human body that replicate or mimic those produced by a controlled
substance;
(c) The product or substance is marketed or advertised for a
particular use or purpose and the cost of the product or substance is
disproportionately higher than other products or substances marketed or
advertised for the same or similar use or purpose;
(d) The packaging or label on the product or substance contains
words or markings that state or suggest that the product or substance is
in compliance with state and federal laws regulating controlled
substances;
(e) The owner or person in control of the product or substance uses
evasive tactics or actions to avoid detection or inspection of the
product or substance by law enforcement authorities;
(f) The owner or person in control of the product or substance makes
a verbal or written statement suggesting or implying that the product or
substance is a synthetic drug or that consumption of the product or
substance will replicate or mimic effects on the human body to those
effects commonly produced through use or consumption of a controlled
substance;
(g) The owner or person in control of the product or substance makes
a verbal or written statement to a prospective customer, buyer, or
recipient of the product or substance implying that the product or
substance may be resold for profit; or
(h) The product or substance contains a chemical or chemical
-10-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
compound that does not have a legitimate relationship to the use or
purpose claimed by the seller, distributor, packer, or manufacturer of
the product or substance or indicated by the product name, appearing on
the product's packaging or label or depicted in advertisement of the
product or substance.
Sec. 2. Section 28-405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-405 The following are the schedules of controlled substances
referred to in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, unless specifically
contained on the list of exempted products of the Drug Enforcement
Administration of the United States Department of Justice as the list
existed on January 31, 2022:
Schedule I
(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless
specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetylmethadol;
(2) Allylprodine;
(3) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol which is also
known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, and LAAM;
(4) Alphameprodine;
(5) Alphamethadol;
(6) Benzethidine;
(7) Betacetylmethadol;
(8) Betameprodine;
(9) Betamethadol;
(10) Betaprodine;
(11) Clonitazene;
(12) Dextromoramide;
(13) Difenoxin;
-11-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(14) Diampromide;
(15) Diethylthiambutene;
(16) Dimenoxadol;
(17) Dimepheptanol;
(18) Dimethylthiambutene;
(19) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(20) Dipipanone;
(21) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(22) Etonitazene;
(23) Etoxeridine;
(24) Furethidine;
(25) Hydroxypethidine;
(26) Ketobemidone;
(27) Levomoramide;
(28) Levophenacylmorphan;
(29) Morpheridine;
(30) Noracymethadol;
(31) Norlevorphanol;
(32) Normethadone;
(33) Norpipanone;
(34) Phenadoxone;
(35) Phenampromide;
(36) Phenomorphan;
(37) Phenoperidine;
(38) Piritramide;
(39) Proheptazine;
(40) Properidine;
(41) Propiram;
(42) Racemoramide;
(43) Trimeperidine;
(44) Alpha-methylfentanyl, N-(1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-
-12-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
piperidyl) propionanilide, 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)
piperidine;
(45) Tilidine;
(46) 3-Methylfentanyl, N-(3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl)-N-
phenylpropanamide, its optical and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
isomers;
(47) 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine (MPPP), its optical
isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
(48) PEPAP, 1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine, its
optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
(49) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl, N-(1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl)-N-phenylacetamide, its optical isomers, salts, and salts of
isomers;
(50) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl, N-(1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide, its optical isomers, salts, and salts
of isomers;
(51) Benzylfentanyl, N-(1-benzyl-4-piperidyl)-N-phenylpropanamide,
its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
(52) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl, N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide, its optical isomers, salts, and salts
of isomers;
(53) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, (other name: N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-
phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide), its optical and
geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
(54) 3-methylthiofentanyl, N-(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide, its optical and geometric isomers,
salts, and salts of isomers;
(55) N-(1-(2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl)-N-phenylpropanamide
(thenylfentanyl), its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
(56) Thiofentanyl, N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-
propanamide, its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
-13-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(57) Para-fluorofentanyl, N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-(2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl)propanamide, its optical isomers, salts, and salts of
isomers;
(58) U-47700, 3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide;
(59) 4-Fluoroisobutyryl Fentanyl;
(60) Acetyl Fentanyl;
(61) Acyrloylfentanyl;
(62) AH-7921; 3, 4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino) cyclohexylmethyl]
benzamide;
(63) Butyryl fentanyl;
(64) Cyclopentyl fentanyl;
(65) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;
(66) Furanyl fentanyl;
(67) Isobutyryl fentanyl;
(68) Isotonitazene;
(69) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl;
(70) MT-45; 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl) piperazine;
(71) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl;
(72) 2-fluorofentanyl; N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
yl) propionamide;
(73) Ocfentanil;
(74) Ortho-Fluorofentanyl;
(75) Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl;
(76) Para-Fluorobutyryl Fentanyl;
(77) Valeryl fentanyl;
(78) Phenyl Fentanyl;
(79) Para-Methylfentanyl;
(80) Thiofuranyl Fentanyl;
(81) Beta-methyl Fentanyl;
(82) Beta'-Phenyl Fentanyl;
-14-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(83) Crotonyl Fentanyl;
(84) 2'-Fluoro Ortho-Fluorofentanyl;
(85) 4'-Methyl Acetyl Fentanyl;
(86) Ortho-Fluorobutyryl Fentanyl;
(87) Ortho-Methyl Acetylfentanyl;
(88) Ortho-Methyl Methoxyacetyl Fentanyl;
(89) Ortho-Fluoroacryl Fentanyl;
(90) Fentanyl Carbamate;
(91) Ortho-Fluoroisobutyryl Fentanyl;
(92) Para-Fluoro Furanyl Fentanyl;
(93) Para-Methoxybutyryl Fentanyl;
(94) Brorphine (other name: 1-(1-(1-(4-bromophenyl) ethyl)
piperidin-4-yl-1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[D]imidazole-2-one); and
(95) Fentanyl-related substances, their isomers, esters, ethers,
salts and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Unless specifically
excepted, listed in another schedule, or specifically named in this
schedule, this includes any substance that is structurally related to
fentanyl by one or more of the following modifications:
(A) Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any
monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle;
(B) Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl,
alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;
(C) Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl,
alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino, or nitro groups;
(D) Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle
whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; or
(E) Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group.
(b) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers,
and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:
-15-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;
(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine; and
(23) Thebacon.
(c) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation, and, for purposes of this subdivision
only, isomer shall include the optical, position, and geometric isomers:
(1) Bufotenine. Trade and other names shall include, but are not
limited to: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-
-16-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N,N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-
dimethyltryptamine; and mappine;
(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine. Trade and other names shall
include, but are not limited to: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-
methylphenethylamine; and 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;
(3) 4-methoxyamphetamine. Trade and other names shall include, but
are not limited to: 4-methoxy-alpha-methylphenethylamine; and
paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;
(4) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine. Trade and other names shall
include, but are not limited to: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-alpha-
methylphenethylamine; DOM; and STP;
(5) Para-methoxymethamphetamine. Trade and other names shall
include, but are not limited to: 1-(4-Methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-
amine, PMMA, and 4-MMA;
(6) Ibogaine. Trade and other names shall include, but are not
limited to: 7-Ethyl-6,6beta,7,8,9,10,12,13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-
methano-5H-pyrido (1',2':1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; and Tabernanthe
iboga;
(7) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(8) Marijuana;
(9) Mescaline;
(10) Methoxetamine (MXE);
(11) Peyote. Peyote shall mean all parts of the plant presently
classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing
or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and
every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation
of such plant or its seeds or extracts;
(12) Psilocybin;
(13) Psilocyn;
(14) Tetrahydrocannabinols, including, but not limited to, synthetic
equivalents of the substances contained in the plant or in the resinous
-17-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
extractives of cannabis, sp. or synthetic substances, derivatives, and
their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological
activity such as the following: Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol
and their optical isomers, excluding dronabinol in a drug product
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration; Delta 6 cis or
trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers; and Delta 3,4 cis
or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and its optical isomers. Since nomenclature
of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of
these structures shall be included regardless of the numerical
designation of atomic positions covered. Tetrahydrocannabinols does not
include cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(15) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(16) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(17) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine. Trade and other names shall
include, but are not limited to: 1-(1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl)-piperidine;
2-thienyl analog of phencyclidine; TPCP; and TCP;
(18) Hashish or concentrated cannabis;
(19) Parahexyl. Trade and other names shall include, but are not
limited to: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-
dibenzo(b,d)pyran; and Synhexyl;
(20) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine. Trade and other names shall
include, but are not limited to: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine; (1-
phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine;
cyclohexamine; and PCE;
(21) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine. Trade and other names
shall include, but are not limited to: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-
pyrrolidine; PCPy; and PHP;
(22) Alpha-ethyltryptamine. Some trade or other names: etryptamine;
Monase; alpha-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole;
alpha-ET; and AET;
-18-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(23) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphet-amine; and DOET;
(24) 1-(1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; and TCPy;
(25) Alpha-methyltryptamine, which is also known as AMT;
(26) Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A. Salvia divinorum or
Salvinorin A includes all parts of the plant presently classified
botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not, the seeds
thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound,
manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its
seeds, or its extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation;
(27) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
quantity of synthetically produced cannabinoids as listed in subdivisions
(A) through (L) of this subdivision, including their salts, isomers,
salts of isomers, and nitrogen, oxygen, or sulfur-heterocyclic analogs,
unless specifically excepted elsewhere in this section. Since
nomenclature of these synthetically produced cannabinoids is not
internationally standardized and may continually evolve, these structures
or compounds of these structures shall be included under this
subdivision, regardless of their specific numerical designation of atomic
positions covered, so long as it can be determined through a recognized
method of scientific testing or analysis that the substance contains
properties that fit within one or more of the following categories:
(A) Tetrahydrocannabinols: Meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally
contained in a plant of the genus cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as
synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the
resinous extractives of cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances,
derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity such as the following: Delta 1 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; Delta 6 cis or trans
tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; Delta 3,4 cis or trans
-19-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers. This subdivision does not
include cannabidiol contained in a drug product approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration;
(B) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(C) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1 H-indol-3-
yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom
of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(D) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(E) Naphthylideneindenes: Any compound containing a
naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the
indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
-20-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(F) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of
the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(G) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of
the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not substituted in or on any of
the listed ring systems to any extent;
(H) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, cyanoalkyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, or tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not
further substituted in or on any of the listed ring systems to any
extent;
(I) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-adamantoylindole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl,
-21-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl,
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, or tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not
further substituted in or on any of the listed ring systems to any
extent;
(J) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
tetramethylcyclopropanoylindole structure with substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, halobenzyl, benzyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-
methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, whether or not further substituted in or
on any of the listed ring systems to any extent;
(K) Indole carboxamides: Any compound containing a 1-indole-3-
carboxamide structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl,
benzyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, substitution at the carboxamide group by
an alkyl, methoxy, benzyl, propionaldehyde, adamantyl, 1-naphthyl,
phenyl, aminooxoalkyl group, or quinolinyl group, whether or not further
substituted in or on any of the listed ring systems to any extent or to
the adamantyl, 1-mapthyl, phenyl, aminooxoalkyl, benzyl, or
propionaldehyde groups to any extent;
(L) Indole carboxylates: Any compound containing a 1-indole-3-
carboxylate structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, halobenzyl,
benzyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or
-22-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
tetrahydropyranylmethyl group, substitution at the carboxylate group by
an alkyl, methoxy, benzyl, propionaldehyde, adamantyl, 1-naphthyl,
phenyl, aminooxoalkyl group, or quinolinyl group, whether or not further
substituted in or on any of the listed ring systems to any extent or to
the adamantyl, 1-mapthyl, phenyl, aminooxoalkyl, benzyl, or
propionaldehyde groups to any extent; and
(M) Any nonnaturally occurring substance, chemical compound,
mixture, or preparation, not specifically listed elsewhere in these
schedules and which is not approved for human consumption by the federal
Food and Drug Administration, containing or constituting a cannabinoid
receptor agonist as defined in section 28-401;
(28) Zipeprol 1-methoxy-3-[4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl)piperazin-1-
yl]-1-phenylpropan-2-ol, including its isomers, esters, ethers, salts,
and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such
isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific
chemical designation;
(29) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
quantity of a substituted phenethylamine as listed in subdivisions (A)
through (C) of this subdivision, unless specifically excepted, listed in
another schedule, or specifically named in this schedule, that is
structurally derived from phenylethan-2-amine by substitution on the
phenyl ring with a fused methylenedioxy ring, fused furan ring, or a
fused tetrahydrofuran ring; by substitution with two alkoxy groups; by
substitution with one alkoxy and either one fused furan, tetrahydrofuran,
or tetrahydropyran ring system; or by substitution with two fused ring
systems from any combination of the furan, tetrahydrofuran, or
tetrahydropyran ring systems, whether or not the compound is further
modified in any of the following ways:
(A) Substitution of the phenyl ring by any halo, hydroxyl, alkyl,
trifluoromethyl, alkoxy, or alkylthio groups; (B) substitution at the 2-
position by any alkyl groups; or (C) substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen
-23-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, hydroxybenzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups,
and including, but not limited to:
(i) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known
as 2C-C or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine;
(ii) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known
as 2C-D or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine;
(iii) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known
as 2C-E or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine;
(iv) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-H
or 2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine;
(v) 2-(4-lodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known as
2C-I or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine;
(vi) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine, which is also known
as 2C-N or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine;
(vii) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine, which is also
known as 2C-P or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-propylphenethylamine;
(viii) 2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine, which is
also known as 2C-T-2 or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylthiophenethylamine;
(ix) 2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine, which is
also known as 2C-T-4 or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-isopropylthiophenethylamine;
(x) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine, which is also known
as 2C-B or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine;
(xi) 2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(methylthio)phenyl)ethanamine, which is also
known as 2C-T or 4-methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
(xii) 1-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenyl)-propan-2-amine, which is also
known as DOI or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine;
(xiii) 1-(4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-2-aminopropane, which is also
known as DOB or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromoamphetamine;
(xiv) 1-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-phenyl)propan-2-amine, which is also
known as DOC or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine;
(xv) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-
-24-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-B-NBOMe; 25B-
NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine;
(xvi) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-
methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-I-NBOMe; 25I-
NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine;
(xvii) N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-2-(3,4,5-trimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine,
which is also known as Mescaline-NBOMe or 3,4,5-trimethoxy-N-(2-
methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine;
(xviii) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-
methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-C-NBOMe; or
25C-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloro-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine;
(xix) 2-(7-Bromo-5-methoxy-2,3-dihydro-1-benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine,
which is also known as 2CB-5-hemiFLY;
(xx) 2-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrofuro [2,3-f][1]benzofuran-4-
yl)ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-B-FLY;
(xxi) 2-(10-Bromo-2,3,4,7,8,9-hexahydropyrano[2,3-g]chromen-5-
yl)ethanamine, which is also known as 2C-B-butterFLY;
(xxii) N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-1-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7- tetrahydrobenzo[1,2-
b:4,5-b']difuran-4-yl)-2-aminoethane, which is also known as 2C-B-FLY-
NBOMe;
(xxiii) 1-(4-Bromofuro[2,3-f][1]benzofuran-8-yl)propan-2-amine,
which is also known as bromo-benzodifuranylisopropylamine or bromo-
dragonFLY;
(xxiv) N-(2-Hydroxybenzyl)-4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, which
is also known as 2C-INBOH or 25I-NBOH;
(xxv) 5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, which is also known as 5-APB;
(xxvi) 6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, which is also known as 6-APB;
(xxvii) 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, which is also known
as 5-APDB;
(xxviii) 6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, which is also
known as 6-APDB;
-25-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(xxix) 2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, which is also known as 2, 5-
dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2, 5-DMA;
(xxx) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine, which is also known as DOET;
(xxxi) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine, which is also
known as 2C-T-7;
(xxxii) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(xxxiii) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, which is also known as
4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amethylphenethylamine; DOM and STP;
(xxxiv) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine, which is also known as MDA;
(xxxv) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine, which is also known as
MDMA;
(xxxvi) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, which is also known
as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, MDE, MDEA;
(xxxvii) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; and
(xxxviii) n-hydroxy-3, 4-Methylenedioxy-N-Hydroxyamphetamine, which
is also known as N-hydroxyMDA;
(30) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
quantity of a substituted tryptamine unless specifically excepted, listed
in another schedule, or specifically named in this schedule, that is
structurally derived from 2-(1H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine, which is also
known as tryptamine, by mono- or di-substitution of the amine nitrogen
with alkyl or alkenyl groups or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom
in a cyclic structure whether or not the compound is further substituted
at the alpha position with an alkyl group or whether or not further
substituted on the indole ring to any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy,
halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy groups, and including, but not limited to:
(A) 5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine, which is also known as 5-MeO-
DALT;
(B) 4-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, which is also known as 4-AcO-
DMT or OAcetylpsilocin;
(C) 4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine, which is also known as 4-
-26-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
HO-MET;
(D) 4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine, which is also known as 4-
HO-DIPT;
(E) 5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, which is also known as
5-MeOMiPT;
(F) 5-Methoxy-N,N-Dimethyltryptamine, which is also known as 5-MeO-
DMT;
(G) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine, which is also known as 5-
MeO-DiPT;
(H) Diethyltryptamine, which is also known as N,N-Diethyltryptamine,
DET; and
(I) Dimethyltryptamine, which is also known as DMT; and
(31)(A) Any substance containing any quantity of the following
materials, compounds, mixtures, or structures:
(i) 3,4-methylenedioxymethcathinone, or bk-MDMA, or methylone;
(ii) 3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone, or MDPV;
(iii) 4-methylmethcathinone, or 4-MMC, or mephedrone;
(iv) 4-methoxymethcathinone, or bk-PMMA, or PMMC, or methedrone;
(v) Fluoromethcathinone, or FMC;
(vi) Naphthylpyrovalerone, or naphyrone; or
(vii) Beta-keto-N-methylbenzodioxolylpropylamine or bk-MBDB or
butylone; or
(B) Unless listed in another schedule, any substance which contains
any quantity of any material, compound, mixture, or structure, other than
bupropion, that is structurally derived by any means from 2-
aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl,
naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is
further modified in any of the following ways:
(i) Substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl,
alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents,
whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one or more
-27-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
other univalent substituents;
(ii) Substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl
substituent; or
(iii) Substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl or
dialkyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic
structure.
(d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on
the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Amineptine 7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]-cyclohepten-5-
yl)amino]heptanoic acid, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers;
(2) Mecloqualone;
(3) Methaqualone; and
(4) Gamma-Hydroxybutyric Acid. Some other names include: GHB; Gamma-
hydroxybutyrate; 4-Hydroxybutyrate; 4-Hydroxybutanoic Acid; Sodium
Oxybate; and Sodium Oxybutyrate.
(e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the
central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers:
(1) Fenethylline;
(2) N-ethylamphetamine;
(3) Aminorex; aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4,5-
dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;
(4) Cathinone; 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone; alpha-
aminopropiophenone; 2-aminopropiophenone; and norephedrone;
-28-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(5) Methcathinone, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical
isomers. Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-
(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-
N-methylaminopropiophenone; methylcathinone; monomethylpropion;
ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463; UR1432; and 4-MEC;
(6) (+/-)cis-4-methylaminorex; and (+/-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-
phenyl-2-oxazolamine;
(7) N,N-dimethylamphetamine; N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine;
and N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine;
(8) Benzylpiperazine, 1-benzylpiperazine;
(9) 4,4'-dimethylaminorex (other names: 4,4'-DMAR, 4,5-dihydro-4-
methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazolamine); and
(10) N-phenyl-N' -(3-(1- phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3-
ium-5-yl)carbamimidate), including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers.
(f) Kratom.
(g) (f) Any controlled substance analogue to the extent intended for
human consumption.
Schedule II
(a) Any of the following substances except those narcotic drugs
listed in other schedules whether produced directly or indirectly by
extraction from substances of vegetable origin, independently by means of
chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical
synthesis:
(1) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, buprenorphine,
thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene,
naloxone, and naltrexone and their salts, but including the following:
(A) Raw opium;
(B) Opium extracts;
(C) Opium fluid;
-29-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(D) Powdered opium;
(E) Granulated opium;
(F) Tincture of opium;
(G) Codeine;
(H) Ethylmorphine;
(I) Etorphine hydrochloride;
(J) Hydrocodone;
(K) Hydromorphone;
(L) Metopon;
(M) Morphine;
(N) Oxycodone;
(O) Oxymorphone;
(P) Oripavine;
(Q) Thebaine; and
(R) Dihydroetorphine;
(2) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent to or identical with any of the substances referred
to in subdivision (1) of this subdivision, except that these substances
shall not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
(3) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
thereof which is chemically equivalent to or identical with any of these
substances, including cocaine or ecgonine and its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of optical isomers, except that the substances shall not
include decocainized coca leaves or extractions which do not contain
cocaine or ecgonine; and
(5) Concentrate of poppy straw, the crude extract of poppy straw in
either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrene
alkaloids of the opium poppy.
(b) Unless specifically excepted or unless in another schedule any
-30-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts,
and salts of their isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of
such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific
chemical designation, dextrorphan excepted:
(1) Alphaprodine;
(2) Anileridine;
(3) Bezitramide;
(4) Diphenoxylate;
(5) Fentanyl;
(6) Isomethadone;
(7) Levomethorphan;
(8) Levorphanol;
(9) Metazocine;
(10) Methadone;
(11) Methadone-intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,4-diphenyl
butane;
(12) Moramide-intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1,1-
diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid;
(13) Norfentanyl (N-phenyl-N-piperidin-4-yl) propionamide;
(14) Oliceridine;
(15) Pethidine or meperidine;
(16) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;
(17) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-
carboxylate;
(18) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-
carboxylic acid;
(19) Phenazocine;
(20) Piminodine;
(21) Racemethorphan;
(22) Racemorphan;
(23) Dihydrocodeine;
-31-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(24) Bulk Propoxyphene in nondosage forms;
(25) Sufentanil;
(26) Alfentanil;
(27) Levo-alphacetylmethadol which is also known as levo-alpha-
acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, and LAAM;
(28) Carfentanil;
(29) Remifentanil;
(30) Tapentadol; and
(31) Thiafentanil.
(c) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a potential for abuse
associated with a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
(1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
optical isomers;
(2) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
(3) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
(4) Methylphenidate; and
(5) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers.
(d) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a potential for abuse
associated with a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designations:
(1) Amobarbital;
(2) Secobarbital;
(3) Pentobarbital;
(4) Phencyclidine; and
(5) Glutethimide.
(e) Hallucinogenic substances known as:
(1) Nabilone. Another name for nabilone: (+/-)-trans-3-(1,1-
-32-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
dimethylheptyl)- 6,6a,7,8,10,10a-Hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H-
dibenzo(b,d)pyran-9-one; and
(2) Dronabinol in an oral solution in a drug product approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration.
(f) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances:
(1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:
Phenylacetone. Trade and other names shall include, but are not limited
to: Phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; and methyl benzyl
ketone;
(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine, PCP:
(A) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine; or
(B) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile, PCC; or
(3) Immediate precursor to fentanyl; 4-anilino-N-phenethylpiperidine
(ANPP).
Schedule III
(a) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a potential for abuse
associated with a stimulant effect on the central nervous system,
including their salts, isomers, whether optical, position, or geometric,
and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers,
and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
(1) Benzphetamine;
(2) Chlorphentermine;
(3) Clortermine; and
(4) Phendimetrazine.
(b) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a potential for abuse
associated with a depressant effect on the central nervous system:
-33-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(1) Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of
barbituric acid or any salt of a derivative of barbituric acid, except
those substances which are specifically listed in other schedules of this
section;
(2) Aprobarbital;
(3) Butabarbital;
(4) Butalbital;
(5) Butethal;
(6) Butobarbital;
(7) Chlorhexadol;
(8) Embutramide;
(9) Lysergic acid;
(10) Lysergic acid amide;
(11) Methyprylon;
(12) Perampanel;
(13) Secbutabarbital;
(14) Sulfondiethylmethane;
(15) Sulfonethylmethane;
(16) Sulfonmethane;
(17) Nalorphine;
(18) Talbutal;
(19) Thiamylal;
(20) Thiopental;
(21) Vinbarbital;
(22) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing amobarbital,
secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt thereof and one or more other
active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule;
(23) Any suppository dosage form containing amobarbital,
secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt of any of these drugs and
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for marketing only
as a suppository;
-34-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(24) Any drug product containing gamma-hydroxybutyric acid,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an
application is approved under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 355, as such section existed on January 1, 2014;
(25) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. Some other
names for ketamine: (+/-)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-
cyclohexanone; and
(26) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof. Trade or other
names for a tiletamine-zolazepam combination product shall include, but
are not limited to: telazol. Trade or other names for tiletamine shall
include, but are not limited to: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-
cyclohexanone. Trade or other names for zolazepam shall include, but are
not limited to: 4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-
trimethylpyrazolo-(3,4-e) (1,4)-diazepin-7(1H)-one, and flupyrazapon.
(c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule:
(1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing
limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or any salts
calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities
as set forth below:
(A) Not more than one and eight-tenths grams of codeine per one
hundred milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage unit,
with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;
(B) Not more than one and eight-tenths grams of codeine per one
hundred milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage unit,
with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
(C) Not more than one and eight-tenths grams of dihydrocodeine per
one hundred milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage
unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
-35-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(D) Not more than three hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one
hundred milliliters or not more than fifteen milligrams per dosage unit,
with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;
(E) Not more than five hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred
milliliters or per one hundred grams, or not more than twenty-five
milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; and
(F) Not more than fifty milligrams of morphine per one hundred
milliliters or per one hundred grams with one or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; and
(2) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
of the following narcotic drug or its salts, as set forth below:
(A) Buprenorphine.
(d) Unless contained on the list of exempt anabolic steroids of the
Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of
Justice as the list existed on January 31, 2022, any anabolic steroid,
which shall include any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any quantity of the following substances, including its salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) 3-beta,17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
(2) 3-alpha,17-beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
(3) 5-alpha-androstan-3,17-dione;
(4) 1-androstenediol (3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxy-5-alpha-androst-1-
ene);
(5) 1-androstenediol (3-alpha,17-beta-dihydroxy-5-alpha-androst-1-
ene);
(6) 4-androstenediol (3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
(7) 5-androstenediol (3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
(8) 1-androstenedione ([5-alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
-36-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(9) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
(10) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);
(11) Bolasterone (7-alpha,17-alpha-dimethyl-17-beta-
hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
(12) Boldenone (17-beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4-diene-3-one);
(13) Boldione (androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-3-one);
(14) Calusterone (7-beta,17-alpha-dimethyl-17-beta-hydroxyandrost-4-
en-3-one);
(15) Clostebol (4-chloro-17-beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
(16) Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17-beta-hydroxy-17-
alpha-methyl-androst-1,4-dien-3-one);
(17) Desoxymethyltestosterone (17-alpha-methyl-5-alpha-androst-2-
en-17-beta-ol) (a.k.a. 'madol');
(18) Delta-1-Dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a. '1-testosterone')(17-beta-
hydroxy-5-alpha-androst-1-en-3-one);
(19) 4-Dihydrotestosterone (17-beta-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);
(20) Drostanolone (17-beta-hydroxy-2-alpha-methyl-5-alpha-
androstan-3-one);
(21) Ethylestrenol (17-alpha-ethyl-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
(22) Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17-alpha-methyl-11-beta,17-beta-
dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
(23) Formebulone (formebolone); (2-formyl-17-alpha-methyl-11-
alpha,17-beta-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
(24) Furazabol (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-
furazan);
(25) 13-beta-ethyl-17-beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
(26) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17-beta-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);
(27) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17-beta-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-
one);
(28) Mestanolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxy-5-androstan-3-
one);
-37-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(29) Mesterolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxy-5-androstan-3-
one);
(30) Methandienone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4-
dien-3-one);
(31) Methandriol (17-alpha-methyl-3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxyandrost-5-
ene);
(32) Methasterone (2-alpha,17-alpha-dimethyl-5-alpha-androstan-17-
beta-ol-3-one);
(33) Methenolone (1-methyl-17-beta-hydroxy-5-alpha-androst-1-en-3-
one);
(34) 17-alpha-methyl-3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
(35) 17-alpha-methyl-3-alpha,17-beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;
(36) 17-alpha-methyl-3-beta,17-beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
(37) 17-alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17-alpha-methyl-4-
hydroxy-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
(38) Methyldienolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-
dien-3-one);
(39) Methyltrienolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyestra-4,9,11-
trien-3-one);
(40) Methyltestosterone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyandrost-4-
en-3-one);
(41) Mibolerone (7-alpha,17-alpha-dimethyl-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-
en-3-one);
(42) 17-alpha-methyl-delta-1-dihydrotestosterone (17-beta-
hydroxy-17-alpha-methyl-5-alpha-androst-1-en-3-one) (a.k.a. '17-alpha-
methyl-1-testosterone');
(43) Nandrolone (17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
(44) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3-beta, 17-beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
(45) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3-alpha, 17-beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
(46) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3-beta, 17-beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
(47) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3-alpha, 17-beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
-38-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(48) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-
dione);
(49) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
(50) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
(51) Norbolethone (13-beta, 17-alpha-diethyl-17-beta-hydroxygon-4-
en-3-one);
(52) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
(53) Norethandrolone (17-alpha-ethyl-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
one);
(54) Normethandrolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
one);
(55) Oxandrolone (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5-alpha]-
androstan-3-one);
(56) Oxymesterone (17-alpha-methyl-4,17-beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-
en-3-one);
(57) Oxymetholone (17-alpha-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17-beta-
hydroxy-[5-alpha]-androstan-3-one);
(58) Prostanozol (17-beta-hydroxy-5-alpha-androstano[3,2-
c]pyrazole);
(59) Stanozolol (17-alpha-methyl-17-beta-hydroxy-[5-alpha]-
androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
(60) Stenbolone (17-beta-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5-alpha]-androst-1-en-3-
one);
(61) Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-
oic acid lactone);
(62) Testosterone (17-beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
(63) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13-beta, 17-alpha-diethyl-17-beta-
hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
(64) Trenbolone (17-beta-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
(65) [3,2-c]-furazan-5 alpha-androstane-17 beta-ol;
(66) [3,2-c]pyrazole-androst-4-en-17 beta-ol;
-39-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(67) 17 alpha-methyl-androst-ene-3,17 beta-diol;
(68) 17 alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17 beta-diol;
(69) 17 alpha-methyl-androstan-3-hydroxyimine-17 beta-ol;
(70) 17 beta-hydroxy-androstano[2,3-d]isoxazole;
(71) 17 beta-hydroxy-androstano[3,2-c]isoxazole;
(72) 18a-homo-3-hydroxy-estra-2,5(10)-dien-17-one;
(73) 2 alpha, 3 alpha-epithio-17 alpha-methyl-5 alpha-androstan-17
beta-ol;
(74) 4-chloro-17 alpha-methyl-17 beta-hydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one;
(75) 4-chloro-17 alpha-methyl-17 beta-hydroxy-androst-4-en-3,11-
dione;
(76) 4-chloro-17 alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3 beta,17 beta-diol;
(77) 4-chloro-17 alpha-methyl-androsta-1,4-diene-3,17 beta-diol;
(78) 4-hydroxy-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;
(79) 5 alpha-Androstan-3,6,17-trione;
(80) 6-bromo-androst-1,4-diene-3,17-dione;
(81) 6-bromo-androstan-3,17-dione;
(82) 6 alpha-methyl-androst-4-ene-3,17-dione;
(83) Delta 1-dihydrotestosterone;
(84) Estra-4,9,11-triene-3,17-dione; and
(85) Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance described or
listed in this subdivision if the salt, ester, or ether promotes muscle
growth.
(e) Hallucinogenic substances known as:
(1) Dronabinol, synthetic, in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft
gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration. Some other names for dronabinol are (6aR-
trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo
(b,d)pyran-1-ol or (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.
Schedule IV
(a) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
-40-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
any quantity of the following substances, including their salts, isomers,
and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Barbital;
(2) Chloral betaine;
(3) Chloral hydrate;
(4) Chlordiazepoxide, but not including librax (chlordiazepoxide
hydrochloride and clindinium bromide) or menrium (chlordiazepoxide and
water soluble esterified estrogens);
(5) Clonazepam;
(6) Clorazepate;
(7) Daridorexant;
(8) Diazepam;
(9) Ethchlorvynol;
(10) Ethinamate;
(11) Flurazepam;
(12) Mebutamate;
(13) Meprobamate;
(14) Methohexital;
(15) Methylphenobarbital;
(16) Oxazepam;
(17) Paraldehyde;
(18) Petrichloral;
(19) Phenobarbital;
(20) Prazepam;
(21) Alprazolam;
(22) Bromazepam;
(23) Camazepam;
(24) Clobazam;
(25) Clotiazepam;
(26) Cloxazolam;
-41-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(27) Delorazepam;
(28) Estazolam;
(29) Ethyl loflazepate;
(30) Fludiazepam;
(31) Flunitrazepam;
(32) Halazepam;
(33) Haloxazolam;
(34) Ketazolam;
(35) Loprazolam;
(36) Lorazepam;
(37) Lormetazepam;
(38) Medazepam;
(39) Nimetazepam;
(40) Nitrazepam;
(41) Nordiazepam;
(42) Oxazolam;
(43) Pinazepam;
(44) Temazepam;
(45) Tetrazepam;
(46) Triazolam;
(47) Midazolam;
(48) Quazepam;
(49) Zolpidem;
(50) Dichloralphenazone;
(51) Zaleplon;
(52) Zopiclone;
(53) Fospropofol;
(54) Alfaxalone;
(55) Suvorexant;
(56) Carisoprodol;
(57) Brexanolone; 3 alpha-hydroxy-5 alpha-pregnan-20-one;
-42-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(58) Lemborexant;
(59) Solriamfetol; 2-amino-3-phenylpropyl carbamate;
(60) Remimazolam; and
(61) Serdexmethylphenidate.
(b) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substance, including its salts, isomers,
whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of such isomers,
whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible: Fenfluramine.
(c) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the
central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, whether optical,
position, or geometric, and salts of such isomers whenever the existence
of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the
specific chemical designation:
(1) Diethylpropion;
(2) Phentermine;
(3) Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates
thereof;
(4) Mazindol;
(5) Pipradrol;
(6) SPA, ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
(7) Cathine. Another name for cathine is ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
(8) Fencamfamin;
(9) Fenproporex;
(10) Mefenorex;
(11) Modafinil; and
(12) Sibutramine.
(d) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
-43-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
any quantity of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts or isomers
calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities
as set forth below:
(1) Propoxyphene in manufactured dosage forms;
(2) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not less than
twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit; and
(3) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its
salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of these isomers to
include: Tramadol.
(e) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substances substance, including their its
salts:
(1) Pentazocine; and
(2) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers).
(f) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substance substances, including its salts,
isomers, and salts of such isomers, whenever the existence of such salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible: Lorcaserin.
(g)(1) Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of the following substance, including its salts, optical
isomers, and salts of such optical isomers: Ephedrine.
(2) The following drug products containing ephedrine, its salts,
optical isomers, and salts of such optical isomers, are excepted from
subdivision (g)(1) of Schedule IV if they (A) are stored behind a
counter, in an area not accessible to customers, or in a locked case so
that a customer needs assistance from an employee to access the drug
product; (B) are sold by a person, eighteen years of age or older, in the
course of his or her employment to a customer eighteen years of age or
older with the following restrictions: No customer shall be allowed to
-44-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more than three and six-tenths
grams of ephedrine base during a twenty-four-hour period; no customer
shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more than nine grams of
ephedrine base during a thirty-day period; and the customer shall display
a valid driver's or operator's license, a Nebraska state identification
card, a military identification card, an alien registration card, or a
passport as proof of identification; (C) are labeled and marketed in a
manner consistent with the pertinent OTC Tentative Final or Final
Monograph; (D) are manufactured and distributed for legitimate medicinal
use in a manner that reduces or eliminates the likelihood of abuse; and
(E) are not marketed, advertised, or represented in any manner for the
indication of stimulation, mental alertness, euphoria, ecstasy, a buzz or
high, heightened sexual performance, or increased muscle mass:
(i) Primatene Tablets; and
(ii) Bronkaid Dual Action Caplets.
Schedule V
(a) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the
following limited quantities of narcotic drugs or salts calculated as the
free anhydrous base or alkaloid, which shall include one or more
nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to
confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal
qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
(1) Not more than two hundred milligrams of codeine per one hundred
milliliters or per one hundred grams;
(2) Not more than one hundred milligrams of dihydrocodeine per one
hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
(3) Not more than one hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one
hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
(4) Not more than two and five-tenths milligrams of diphenoxylate
and not less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage
unit;
-45-

LB431 LB431
2025 2025
(5) Not more than one hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred
milliliters or per one hundred grams; and
(6) Not more than five-tenths milligram of difenoxin and not less
than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.
(b) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers: Pyrovalerone.
(c) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers:
(1) Ezogabine (N-(2-amino-4-(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl)-carbamic
acid ethyl ester);
(2) Ganaxolone;
(3) Lacosamide ((R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide);
(4) Pregabalin ((S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid);
(5) Brivaracetam ((2S)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]
butanamide) (also referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact), including its
salts;
(6) Cenobamate; and
(7) Lasmiditan.
Sec. 3. Original sections 28-401 and 28-405, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-46-